Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Chapter 11 Shooting Ranges

Editor's notes. —

This chapter was enacted as chapter 10 by Laws 1995, ch. 40, § 1, but since Laws 1995, ch. 118, § 1, also enacted a chapter 10, this chapter was renumbered as chapter 11.

§ 16-11-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Local government” means a county, city or town;

“Sport shooting range” or “range” means an area designed and operated for the use of rifles, shotguns, pistols, silhouettes, skeet, trap, black powder or any other similar sport shooting.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 40, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As used in this section, “this act” means §§

16-11-101

through

16-11-103

.

§ 16-11-102.
Operation of shooting ranges; liability.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who operates or uses a sport shooting range in this state shall not be subject to civil liability or criminal prosecution in any matter relating to noise or noise pollution resulting from the operation or use of the range if the range is in compliance with any noise control laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at the time construction or operation of the range was approved by a local government.

Any person who operates or uses a sport shooting range is not subject to an action for nuisance, and a court of this state shall not enjoin the use or operation of a range on the basis of noise or noise pollution, if the range is in compliance with any noise control laws or ordinances that applied to the range and its operation at the time construction or operation of the range was approved by a local government.

Rules or regulations adopted by any state department or agency for limiting levels of noise in terms of decibel level which may occur in the outdoor atmosphere shall not apply to a sport shooting range exempted from liability under this act.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 40, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As used in this section, “this act” means §§

16-11-101

through

16-11-103

.

§ 16-11-103.
Regulation of location and construction.

This act does not prohibit a local government from regulating the location and construction of a sport shooting range after the effective date of this act.

History.

Laws 1995, ch. 40, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

As used in this section, “this act” means §§

16-11-101

through

16-11-103

.

Editor's notes. —

The effective date of the act means the effective date of Laws 1995, ch. 40, which became effective February 16, 1995.